Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.902

Transitional provision.

This chapter applies to arbitration of a family law dispute under an arbitration agreement made on or after January 1, 2024. If an arbitration agreement was made before January 1, 2024, the parties may agree in a record that this chapter applies to the arbitration.

[ 2023 c 61 s 28.]